Maryland, session 2025, HB1339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
23–204.
(a) (1) Membership in the Employees’ Pension System is optional for an
individual who is:
(vi) except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, an employee
of a participating governmental unit who is employed by the participating governmental
unit before the effective date of participation and who remains an employee of the
participating governmental unit through the effective date of participation.
(3) An individual described under paragraph (1)(vi) of this subsection who
elects to join the Employees’ Pension System shall make the election prior to the effective
date of participation by filing a written application with the Board of Trustees on a form
that the Board of Trustees provides.
(4) An election to join the Employees’ Pension System under this
subsection is a one–time, irrevocable election.
(5) If an election to join the Employees’ Pension System is not received by
the Board of Trustees within the period of time described in paragraph (2) or (3) of this
subsection, the individual may not elect to join the Employees’ Pension System while
employed in that position.
31–109.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the legislative body of an eligible
governmental unit may approve participation by its employees in the Employees’ Pension
System if:
(1) the legislative body adopts a resolution in the form prescribed by the
Board of Trustees; and
(2) the eligible governmental unit operates a local plan, only if:
(i) at least 60% of the members of the local plan petition to become
members of the Employees’ Pension System;
(ii) the eligible governmental unit satisfies the requirements in
subsection (b) of this section; and

HOUSE BILL 1339 3
(iii) the legislative body approves participation of the eligible
governmental unit in the Employees’ Pension System as though the local plan were not in
operation.
(b) An eligible governmental unit that operates a local plan may approve
participation by its employees in the Employees’ Pension System only if:
(1) the local plan of the eligible governmental unit requires member
contributions at the same rate as the member contribution rate that would be applicable to
employees of the eligible governmental unit in the Employees’ Pension System; or
(2) the eligible governmental unit:
(i) does not provide for the employer pickup of member
contributions to the local plan within the meaning of § 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue
Code; and
(ii) certifies that it will not become an approved employer under §
21–313 of this article on or after the effective date of participation.
(c) (1) If an eligible governmental unit does not satisfy the requirements
under subsection (b) of this section, the eligible governmental unit may submit a request to
the Board of Trustees to participate in the Employees’ Pension System.
(2) The Board of Trustees shall consider a request made under paragraph
(1) of this subsection and determine whether any legislation is necessary to allow the
eligible governmental unit to participate in the Employees’ Pension System.
(3) The Board of Trustees shall make recommendations to the Joint
Committee on Pensions regarding any legislation that it determines is necessary to allow
the eligible governmental unit to participate in the Employees’ Pension System.
31–111.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section and §§ 31–111.1, 31–111.3,
31–111.4, 31–111.5, 31–111.6, 31–111.7, [and] 31–111.8, AND 31–111.9 of this subtitle, if
an employee of a participating governmental unit joins the Employees’ Pension System on
the effective date, the employee is entitled to service credit for employment with the
participating governmental unit before the effective date.
(b) If an employee of the Baltimore Metropolitan Council elects to become a
member of the Employees’ Retirement System or the Employees’ Pension System, the
employee may not receive credit for service from July 1, 1992, to the effective date unless
the employee pays to the Board of Trustees the amount of the member contributions the
employee would have made during that period, plus regular interest.
31–111.9.

HOUSE BILL 1339
(A) AN EMPLOYEE OF THE TOWN OF FOREST HEIGHTS WHO ELECTS
MEMBERSHIP IN THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
23–204(A) OF THIS ARTICLE AND IS AN EMPLOYEE OF THE TOWN OF FOREST
HEIGHTS ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE SHALL RECEIVE ELIGIBILITY SERVICE AND
CREDITABLE SERVICE IN THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM EQUAL TO 50% OF THE
INDIVIDUAL’S PERIOD OF EMPLOYMENT WITH THE TOWN OF FOREST HEIGHTS
BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE AS CERTIFIED BY THE TOWN OF FOREST HEIGHTS AS
OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE.
(B) IF AN EMPLOYEE OR A FORMER EMPLOYEE OF THE TOWN OF FOREST
HEIGHTS BECOMES A MEMBER OF THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM AT ANY TIME
AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE, THE EMPLOYEE MAY NOT RECEIVE SERVICE CREDIT
FOR EMPLOYMENT WITH THE TOWN OF FOREST HEIGHTS BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE
DATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.